Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.300

Joint transportation committee—Created—Duties.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5444-S.SL) ***

The joint transportation committee is created. The executive committee of the joint committee consists of the chairs and ranking members of the house and senate transportation committees. The chairs of the house and senate transportation committees shall serve as cochairs of the joint committee. All members of the house and senate standing committees on transportation are eligible for membership of the joint committee and shall serve when appointed by the executive committee.

The joint transportation committee shall review and research transportation programs and issues in order to educate and promote the dissemination of transportation research to state and local government policymakers, including legislators and associated staff. All four members of the executive committee shall approve the annual work plan. Membership of the committee may vary depending on the subject matter of oversight and research projects. The committee may also make recommendations for functional or performance audits to the transportation performance audit board.

The executive committee shall adopt rules and procedures for its operations.

[ 2005 c 319 s 12.]

NOTES:

Transfers—2005 c 319: See note following RCW 47.01.075.

Findings—Intent—Part headings—Effective dates—2005 c 319: See notes following RCW 43.17.020.